ru: Система подачи лески триммера: Автоматическая подача; Ударная подача; Фиксированная головка с леской; Ручная подача; Другое
ja: トリマーラインフィードシステム: 自動フィード; バンプフィード; 固定ラインヘッド; 手動フィード; その他
lt-LT: Žoliapjovės valo padavimo sistema: Automatinis tiekimas; „Bump feed“; Fiksuota valo galvutė; Rankinis padavimas; Kita
fi: Trimmerin siiman syöttöjärjestelmä: Automaattinen syöttö; Napautussyöttö; Kiinteä siimapää; Manuaalinen syöttö; Muu
tr: Çim biçme makinesi misina besleme sistemi: Otomatik besleme; Darbeli besleme; Sabit hat başlığı; Manuel besleme; Diğer
hu: Fűnyíró szál adagoló rendszere: Automatikus adagolás; Automatikus damiltovábbítás; Fix damilfej; Kézi adagolás; Egyéb
sl-SI: Sistem za podajanje nitke za obrezovalnik: Samodejno podajanje; Podajalni trak; Fiksna glava; Ročno podajanje; Druga
de: Fadenzufuhrsystem für Trimmer: Automatische Zuführung; Bump-Feed; Fester Leitungskopf; Manuelle Zuführung; Sonstiges
da: Trimmertråds fremføringssystem: Automatisk indføring; Bump-indføring; Hoved med fast tråd; Manuel indføring; Andet
fr: Système d’avance du fil de coupe: Avance automatique; Avance par frappe; Tête à fil fixe; Avance manuelle; Autre
pt-BR: Sistema de alimentação de fio de corte: Alimentação automática; Alimentação por impacto; Cabeçote de linha fixa; Alimentação manual; Outro
bg-BG: Система за подаване на кордата на тример: Автоматично подаване; Подаване чрез почукване; Фиксирана глава за корда; Ръчно подаване; Друго
it: Sistema di alimentazione del filo del decespugliatore: Alimentazione automatica; Alimentazione a impulso; Testa di linea fissa; Alimentazione manuale; Altro
ko: 트리머 라인 공급 방식: 자동 피드; 범프 피드; 고정 라인 헤드; 수동 피드; 기타
zh-CN: 修剪线输送系统: 自动进料式; 拍击进料式; 固定线头; 手动进料式; 其他
es: Sistema de alimentación de cable de la desbrozadora: Alimentación automática; Alimentación por impacto; Cabezal de línea fija; Alimentación manual; Otros
sk-SK: Spôsob vysúvania struny krovinorezu: Automatické podávanie; Nárazové podávanie; Pevná strunová hlava; Manuálne podávanie; Iné
cs: Systém odvíjení struny vyžínače: Automatické podávání; Rázový podavač; Fixní hlava; Ruční podávání; Jiné
el: Σύστημα τροφοδοσίας μεσινέζας: Αυτόματη τροφοδοσία; Τροφοδοσία με χτύπημα; Σταθερή κεφαλή γραμμής; Χειροκίνητη τροφοδοσία; Άλλο
hr-HR: Sustav za uvlačenje niti za trimere: Automatski dovod; Bump feed; Glava s fiksnom niti; Ručno izbacivanje; Ostalo
nl: Draadtoevoersysteem: Automatische invoer; Bump feed; Vaste draadknop; Handmatige invoer; Overig
nb: Trimmertråd-matesystem: Automatisk mating; Støtmating; Fastlinjehode; Manuell mating; Annet
vi: Hệ thống cấp dây cước của máy cắt cỏ: Tự động ra dây; Ra dây bằng cách va chạm; Đầu dây cố định; Ra dây thủ công; Khác
pt-PT: Sistema de alimentação de fio de corte: Alimentação automática; Alimentação por impacto; Cabeça de fio fixo; Alimentação manual; Outro
th: ระบบป้อนเอ็นตัดหญ้า: ปล่อยสายเอ็นอัตโนมัติ; ปล่อยสายเอ็นแบบกระแทก; ปล่อยสายเอ็นแบบตายตัว; ปล่อยสายเอ็นด้วยตนเอง; อื่นๆ
sv: System för matning av trimmertråd: Automatisk matning; Bumpmatning; Fast linjehuvud; Manuell matning; Annat
zh-TW: 除草機出線系統: 自動餵食; 撞擊進線; 固定線頭; 手動出線; 其他
en: Trimmer line feed system: Automatic feed; Bump feed; Fixed line head; Manual feed; Other
pl: System podawania żyłki trymera: Automatyczne wysuwanie żyłki; Wysuwanie przez uderzenie; Głowica z żyłką stałą; Ręczne wysuwanie; Inne
ro-RO: Sistemul de alimentare a firului motocoasei: Alimentare automată; Alimentare prin lovire; Cap cu fir fix; Alimentare manuală; Altele